src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Saami and other languages
! Copyright ©  The University of Tromsø and University of Alberta
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify:
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@hum.uit.no

! ========================================================================== !
!!                           !!! Northern Haida verb affixes                       
! ========================================================================== !

LEXICON VERB_PREFIXES
 INSTRUMENTALS ;
 SHAPE_CLSF ;
 HUMAN_CLSF ;
 DESCRIPTIVE_CLSF ;

LEXICON INSTRUMENTALS
tla%    INS_STEMS ;
kyúu%   INS_STEMS ;

LEXICON SHAPE_CLSF
CL/Shape+CL/cha+:cha%< SHAPE_CLSF_VERBS ;
CL/Shape+CL/tlʼa+:tlʼa%< SHAPE_CLSF_VERBS ;
CL/Shape+CL/sk̲ʼa+:sk̲ʼa%< SHAPE_CLSF_VERBS ;
CL/Shape+CL/skʼa+:skʼa%< SHAPE_CLSF_VERBS ;
CL/Shape+CL/skáa+:skáa%< SHAPE_CLSF_VERBS ;
CL/Shape+CL/gi+:gi%< SHAPE_CLSF_VERBS ; 

LEXICON HUMAN_CLSF
CL/Human+CL/dla+:dla%< HUMAN_CLSF_VERBS ;
CL/Human+CL/x̲a+:x̲a%< HUMAN_CLSF_VERBS ;
CL/Human+CL/tlʼab+:tlʼab%< HUMAN_CLSF_VERBS ;

LEXICON CLASS-AA !!= @CODE@
+V:                            CLASS-AA-INFL ;
+V+Ext:dáal                    CLASS-AAL-INFL  ;
+V+Circum:gwáang               CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Sg:gyaʼáng            CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Sg:gyaʼáang           CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Pl:gyaʼáang           CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Order:hahl                  CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
+V+Incep:hid                   CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Incep:híid                  CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Almost:sgä                  CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Almost:sgáa                 CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn:ʼuhlä               CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn:ʼuhláa              CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Sg:ʼwä                  CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Sg:ʼwáa                 CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Pl:ʼwaʼáang             CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Distrib:ʼuhláaʼagang   CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Distrib:ʼuhláaʼagaang  CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Distrib:háalagang        CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Distrib:háalaagaang      CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Incep:hahlhid         CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Incep:hahlhíid        CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Almost:hahlsgä        CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Almost:hahlsgáa       CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Nocturn:hahlʼuhlä     CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Nocturn:hahlʼuhláa    CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Order:hidhahl         CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Almost:hidsgä         CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Almost:hidsgáa        CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Order:ʼuhlahahl     CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
