src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBS !!= @CODE@
chaagáa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to have ended up as permament residents in location" ;
da% g̲áydangaa CLASS-AA "for S to be able to be pushed around fast [said of something on wheels, such as a table or cart]" ;
daguyáa CLASS-AA "for S to be physically strong, healthy, well; to have authority [said of humans or larger animals]" ;
dáng% gadayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have been plucked, pulled [said of eyebrows and whiskers only]" ;
dángkʼuyaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been cut open and spread apart" ;
gabʼadáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) to have penetrated (in direction) [said of a 1-D object]" ;
giidä% xílayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been shaken dry" ;
gíilaa CLASS-AA "for there to be deep pool(s) or river hole(s) in location" ;
gud% k̲awyáa CLASS-AA "for X to look delicious, be delicious" ;
gúngahldayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have had its valves removed [said of a chiton]" ;
gyaayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have run away in fear" ;
g̲a% chaʼáangwaa CLASS-AA "for S to have cushion(s) on it" ;
g̲a% hlgidíisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <hlgi> to come apart at point, line or plane of weakness, to split apart" ;
g̲a% káldiisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <kál> to come apart at point, line or plane of weakness, to split apart" ;
g̲a% sg̲áamdajaa CLASS-AA "for S <sg̲áam> to come apart at point, line or plane of weakness, to split apart" ;
g̲a% tlʼabdajáa CLASS-AA "for S <tlʼab> to come apart at point, line or plane of weakness, to split apart" ;
g̲adä% skáadaaldayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been made into a mixture of aged and fresh cooked salmon eggs [called g̲adä skáadaal]" ;
g̲awáa CLASS-AA "for S to have fur or body hair on it" ;
g̲ál% chadáal%.ungaa CLASS-AA "for S to be for seining [said of a net]" ;
g̲i% kʼaaystʼayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have been stretched out by being worn" ;
g̲ustʼayáa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to have left" ;
híiluu% xabusdayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have gotten finished fast, have gotten used up fast, have gone by fast [said of food, day, week, month (but not hour)]" ;
hlgúunaa CLASS-AA "for S to be lined with skunk cabbage leaves" ;
hlkáakʼaa CLASS-AA "for S to be riddled with holes [said of something loosely woven, roof, bread with air pockets, etc, not of ragged cloth objects]" ;
hlk̲ʼáamastʼayaa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {hlk̲ʼáam} to have fallen over (in direction)" ;
INS% chiisälangáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {cha} to be made or fixed so as to to wave, swing or rock back and forth by INS" ;
INS% gáwngandayee%.elaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been made into a {gáw} shape, to have been made to be {gáw} shaped" ;
INS% g̲áastʼayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been washed out by current or wave action" ;
INS% hlg̲áydiisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <hlg̲áy> to have been split by <INS>, to have been made to come apart by <INS>" ;
INS% hlk̲ʼwáahldiisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <hlk̲ʼwáahl> to have been split by <INS>, to have been made to come apart by <INS>" ;
INS% kʼudíisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <kʼu> to have been split by <INS>, to have been made to come apart by <INS>" ;
INS% k̲ʼíidiisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <k̲ʼíi> to have been split by <INS>, to have been made to come apart by <INS>" ;
INS% sgaaysälangáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {sga} to be made or fixed so as to to wave, swing or rock back and forth by INS" ;
INS% skáa%.aysälangaa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {skáa} to be made or fixed so as to to wave, swing or rock back and forth by INS" ;
INS% stlʼáamdiisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <stlʼáam> to have been split by <INS>, to have been made to come apart by <INS>" ;
INS% tíingandayee%.elaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been made into a {tíi} shape, to have been made to be {tíi} shaped" ;
INS% tsʼíistʼayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been shucked, removed from its shell" ;
isdaláa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to have been born after X" ;
jaagúusdgaa CLASS-AA "for there to be a northwest wind, for it to blow from the northwest" ;
jáam% táawaa CLASS-AA "for S to be some kind of jam jar or jam dish" ;
kaganáa CLASS-AA "for S to be possessed by evil spirits, be a witch" ;
kámbasgaa CLASS-AA "for S to be (some kind of) a compass" ;
kihl% duungáa CLASS-AA "for S to talk as though they had nothing to do with O; for S to pretend not to be involved in O" ;
kíl% ántsʼayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been killed or murdered by being verbally picked on" ;
kínggwgangaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been asked to look after X, keep an eye on X, take care of X" ;
kúnadiiyaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to not be level, to slant down [said of a floor, table, board, rope, etc.]" ;
kwáagadaa CLASS-AA "for X to be reliable" ;
kyúu% hlgiyangáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {hlgi} to have been tied so that it hangs down" ;
kyúuyayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to have been tied on (in location)" ;
k̲agán% ináa CLASS-AA "for S to have a lump in their throat, feel like crying (over X)" ;
k̲ʼatʼanáa CLASS-AA "for S to be (some kind of) a tidal flat" ;
k̲ʼáalandayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been willed to X" ;
k̲ámahlgayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have developed shallow holes (of any shape) in it" ;
k̲ehjgadáa CLASS-AA "for S to be paid attention to out of respect" ;
k̲ʼi% tlʼáamunangaa CLASS-AA "for big thin pieces of S to have been cut off (of X) with a knife" ;
k̲íihlgaa% da%.áawaa CLASS-AA "1. for S to have a cupboard [said of a home] 2. for S to be some kind of standing cupboard or china cabinet" ;
k̲íiyä% dámidaa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {dám} to have been found" ;
k̲íiyä% hlk̲ʼwáahlidaa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {hlk̲ʼwáahl} to have been found" ;
k̲íiyä% sdahidáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {sdah} to have been found" ;
k̲íiyä% tlʼahidáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {tlʼah} to have been found" ;
k̲ʼu% k̲ʼaldangáa CLASS-AA "for S to amaze, astonish, surprise C by eating (X)" ;
k̲ungáa CLASS-AA "for S to be the moon" ;
k̲ʼwáaljädaa CLASS-AA "for S to be a woman of the opposite moiety" ;
láayaagaa CLASS-AA "for S to be a lawyer" ;
natsʼä% xíldayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have had long-life medicine prepared for them" ;
Sahgwáa% Gitʼanée% k̲igáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) to have a father of the Sahgwáa Gitʼanée clan" ;
Sándiigaa CLASS-AA "for it to be Sunday" ;
sdáaginsgaa CLASS-AA "for S to be some kind of stockings" ;
sgáajuuhldayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have a curve" ;
sgidunangáa CLASS-AA "for pieces of S to have been chopped off (of X)" ;
sg̲anuwáa CLASS-AA "for S to be angry at X, refuse to speak to X out of anger" ;
sg̲idaanägáa CLASS-AA "for there to be ancient or marbled murrelets nesting in location" ;
skʼaʼulayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have been hugging X, squeezing X with their arms for a while" ;
skʼíndayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been sanded" ;
sk̲ʼín% k̲awáa CLASS-AA "for S to be enamelware with white spots on a blue or gray background" ;
stlʼa% g̲áadajaa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) <cha> to have been turned inside out, to have had the other side turned out [said of an eyelid]" ;
stluunántlʼaayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been removed from around the inside surface (of X) with a finger" ;
tʼa% kʼwaanáa CLASS-AA "for S to be a shortcut" ;
tʼaskʼáa CLASS-AA "for S to be some kind of cane" ;
táwkʼayaa CLASS-AA "to be cultivated land (growing X) in location, to be a garden (growing X) in location" ;
tla% júugä% ʼlagáa CLASS-AA "for (the pieces of) S (pl) to have been fitted together well" ;
tla% skúnagahl% k̲ʼáwaansdlayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to have had their house cleaned for them" ;
tlagangáa CLASS-AA "for someone to have vomitted in location, for there to be vomit in location" ;
tláahlahl% gudʼangáa CLASS-AA "for X to have been physically abused" ;
tlʼánuwaa CLASS-AA "for S to have (noticeable) breasts" ;
Tsʼaahl% k̲íiyuwaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to have a father of the Tsʼaahl clan" ;
tsʼánggayaa CLASS-AA "for X to be repulsive" ;
waláa CLASS-AA "for S to be made of wool" ;
xayáa CLASS-AA "for there to be sunshine, for it to sunshine, for it to be sunny" ;
xáysgudayaa CLASS-AA "for it to have failed to sunshine for S [said of foods dried in the sun]" ;
x̲ahláa CLASS-AA "for S to have a mouth" ;
x̲íihl% tʼagagáa CLASS-AA "for S to have a necklace" ;
yáang% k̲áa CLASS-AA "for S to be true, correct, right" ;
